Nebraska, session 109, LB42.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 71-6038, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-6038 For purposes of sections 71-6038 to 71-6042:
(1) Complicated feeding problems include, but are not limited to,
difficulty swallowing, recurrent lung aspirations, and tube or parenteral or
intravenous feedings;
(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(3) Nurse aide means any person employed by a service provider or facility
described in subsection (1) of section 71-6039 for the purpose of aiding a
licensed registered or practical nurse through the performance of
nonspecialized tasks related to the personal care and comfort of residents
other than a paid dining assistant or a licensed registered or practical nurse;
(4) Nursing home means any facility or a distinct part of any facility
that provides care as defined in sections 71-420, 71-421, 71-422, 71-424, and
71-429; and
(5) Paid dining assistant means any person employed by a nursing home for
the purpose of aiding a licensed registered or practical nurse through the
feeding of residents other than a nurse aide or a licensed registered or
practical nurse; and .
(6) Service provider means a person certified by the department to provide
developmental disabilities services.
Sec. 2. Section 71-6039, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-6039 (1) No person shall act as a nurse aide for a service provider
under the medicaid comprehensive developmental disabilities waiver for services
as defined in section 71-6501, or in a facility or a distinct part of a
facility that provides care as defined in section 71-405, 71-406, 71-409,
71-412, 71-416, 71-417, 71-418, 71-419, 71-420, 71-421, 71-422, 71-424, 71-426,
71-427, or 71-429 unless such person:
(a) Is at least sixteen years of age and has not been convicted of a crime
involving moral turpitude;
(b) Is able to speak and understand the English language or a language
understood by a substantial portion of the facility residents; and
(c) Has successfully completed a basic course of training approved by the
department for nurse aides within one hundred twenty days of initial employment
in the capacity of a nurse aide.
(2)(a) A registered nurse or licensed practical nurse whose license has
been revoked, suspended, or voluntarily surrendered in lieu of discipline may
not act as a nurse aide for a service provider or in a facility described in
subsection (1) of this section.
(b) If a person registered as a nurse aide becomes licensed as a
registered nurse or licensed practical nurse, his or her registration as a
nurse aide becomes null and void as of the date of licensure.
(c) A person listed on the Nurse Aide Registry with respect to whom a
finding of conviction has been placed on the registry may petition the
department to have such finding removed at any time after one year has elapsed
since the date such finding was placed on the registry.
(3) The department may prescribe a curriculum for training nurse aides and
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for such courses of training.
The content of the courses of training and competency evaluation programs shall
be consistent with federal requirements unless exempted. The department may
approve courses of training if such courses of training meet the requirements
of this section. Such courses of training shall include instruction on the
responsibility of each nurse aide to report suspected abuse or neglect pursuant
to sections 28-372 and 28-711. Nursing homes may carry out approved courses of
training within the nursing home, except that nursing homes may not conduct the
competency evaluation part of the program. The prescribed training shall be
administered by a licensed registered nurse.
(4) For nurse aides at intermediate care facilities for persons with
developmental disabilities, such courses of training shall be no less than
twenty hours in duration and shall include at least fifteen hours of basic
personal care training and five hours of basic therapeutic and emergency
procedure training, and for nurse aides at all nursing homes other than
intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental disabilities, such
courses shall be no less than seventy-five hours in duration.
(5) This section shall not prohibit any facility from exceeding the
minimum hourly or training requirements.
-1-

LB42 LB42
2025 2025
Sec. 3. Original sections 71-6038 and 71-6039, Reissue Revised Statutes
of Nebraska, are repealed.
-2-